Illinois, session 104th, SB1431.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Sections 3-7002, 3-7004, 3-7005, and 3-7008 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/3-7002)  (from Ch. 34, par. 3-7002)7    Sec. 3-7002. Cook County Sheriff's Merit Board. There is 8created the Cook County Sheriff's Merit Board, hereinafter 9called the Board, consisting of not less than 3 and not more 10than 7 members appointed by the Sheriff with the advice and 11consent of three-fifths of the county board. , except that the 12Sheriff may appoint 2 additional members, with the advice and 13consent of three-fifths of the county board, at his or her 14discretion. Of the members first appointed, one shall serve 15until the third Monday in March, 1965 one until the third 16Monday in March, 1967, and one until the third Monday in March, 171969. Of the 2 additional members first appointed under 18authority of this amendatory Act of 1991, one shall serve 19until the third Monday in March, 1995, and one until the third 20Monday in March, 1997. Of the 2 additional members first 21appointed under the authority of this amendatory Act of the 2291st General Assembly, one shall serve until the third Monday 23in March, 2005 and one shall serve until the third Monday in   SB1431- 2 -LRB104 10832 RTM 20913 b1March, 2006.2    All members Upon the expiration of the terms of office of 3those first appointed (including the 2 additional members 4first appointed under authority of this amendatory Act of 1991 5and under the authority of this amendatory Act of the 91st 6General Assembly), their respective successors shall be 7appointed to hold office from the third Monday in March of the 8year of their respective appointments for a term of 6 years and 9until their successors are appointed and qualified for a like 10term. The terms of the members need not be staggered. As 11additional members are appointed under authority of this 12amendatory Act of 1997, their terms shall be set to be 13staggered consistently with the terms of the existing Board 14members.15    Notwithstanding any provision in this Section to the 16contrary, the term of office of each member of the Board is 17abolished on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 18100th General Assembly. Of the 7 members first appointed after 19the effective date of this Act of the 100th General Assembly, 2 20shall serve until the third Monday in March 2019, 2 shall serve 21until the third Monday in March 2021, and 3 members shall serve 22until the third Monday in March 2023. The terms of the 2 23additional members first appointed after the effective date of 24this Act of the 100th General Assembly shall be staggered 25consistently with the terms of the other Board members. 26Successors or reappointments shall be appointed to hold office   SB1431- 3 -LRB104 10832 RTM 20913 b1for a term ending on the third Monday in March 6 years 2following the preceding term expiration. Each member of the 3Board shall hold office until his or her successor is 4appointed and qualified or the member is reappointed. In all 5appointments, the county board has the power to approve terms 6to ensure the Board fulfills its mandate. 7    In the case of a vacancy in the office of a member prior to 8the conclusion of the member's term, the Sheriff shall, with 9the advice and consent of three-fifths of the county board, 10appoint a person to serve for the remainder of the unexpired 11term. 12    No more than 2 one-half plus one of the members of the 13Board shall be affiliated with the same political party. 14Political affiliation is determined, for purposes of this 15Section, as the political affiliation an appointed member has 16or does not have at the time the appointment is approved by the 17county board and shall continue to be so determined until the 18member discontinues serving on the Board. No member shall have 19held or have been a candidate for an elective public office 20within one year preceding his or her appointment.21    The Sheriff may deputize members of the Board.22(Source: P.A. 100-562, eff. 12-8-17; 100-912, eff. 8-17-18.) 23    (55 ILCS 5/3-7004)  (from Ch. 34, par. 3-7004)24    Sec. 3-7004. Clerical and technical staff assistants and 25hearing officers. The Board is authorized to employ such   SB1431- 4 -LRB104 10832 RTM 20913 b1clerical and technical staff assistants as may be necessary to 2enable the Board to transact its business and to fix their 3compensation. The Board is authorized to employ hearing 4officers to conduct hearings under Section 3-7012. Hearing 5officers employed by the Board shall be qualified to hold the 6position as determined by the Board. Hearing officers shall be 7attorneys licensed to practice law in this State. 8(Source: P.A. 100-912, eff. 8-17-18.) 9    (55 ILCS 5/3-7005)  (from Ch. 34, par. 3-7005)10    Sec. 3-7005. Meetings. As soon as practicable after the 11members of the Board have been appointed, they shall meet, 12upon the call of the Sheriff, and shall organize by selecting a 13chairman and a secretary. The initial chairman and secretary, 14and their successors, shall be selected by the Board from 15among its members for a term of 2 years or for the remainder of 16their term of office as a member of the Board, whichever is the 17shorter. Two members of the Board shall constitute a quorum 18for the transaction of business, except that as additional 19members are appointed under authority of this amendatory Act 20of 1997, the number of members that must be present to 21constitute a quorum shall be the number of members that 22constitute at least 40% of the Board. The Board shall hold 23regular quarterly meetings and such other meetings as may be 24called by the chairman.25(Source: P.A. 90-447, eff. 8-16-97; 90-511, eff. 8-22-97;   SB1431- 5 -LRB104 10832 RTM 20913 b190-655, eff. 7-30-98.) 2    (55 ILCS 5/3-7008)  (from Ch. 34, par. 3-7008)3    Sec. 3-7008. Appointments. The appointment of deputy 4sheriffs in the Police Department, full-time deputy sheriffs 5not employed as county police officers or county corrections 6officers and of employees in the Department of Corrections 7shall be made from those applicants who have been certified by 8the Board as being qualified for appointment. Certification by 9the Board for appointment may be granted upon an applicant's 10successful completion of the Sheriff's application process, 11which includes, but is not limited to, any mental, physical, 12psychiatric and other tests and examinations as may be 13prescribed by the Sheriff. Certification for appointment in 14one department shall not constitute certification for 15appointment in another department. Certification may be made 16at any point prior to appointment and may be made in 17conjunction with the Sheriff's application process. All 18persons so appointed shall, at the time of their appointment, 19be not less than 21 years of age, or 20 years of age and have 20successfully completed 2 years of law enforcement studies at 21an accredited college or university. Any person appointed 22subsequent to successful completion of 2 years of such law 23enforcement studies shall not have power of arrest, nor shall 24he or she be permitted to carry firearms, until he or she 25reaches 21 years of age. Any person appointed shall be a   SB1431- 6 -LRB104 10832 RTM 20913 b1citizen of the United States, an individual who is legally 2authorized to work in the United States under federal law and 3is authorized under federal law to obtain, carry, or purchase 4or otherwise possess a firearm, or an individual against whom 5immigration action has been deferred by the U.S. Citizenship 6and Immigration Services under the federal Deferred Action for 7Childhood Arrivals (DACA) process and who is authorized under 8federal law to obtain, carry, or purchase or otherwise possess 9a firearm. In addition, all persons so appointed shall be not 10more than the maximum age limit fixed by the Board from time to 11time, be of sound mind and body, be of good moral character, 12have not been convicted of a crime which the Board considers to 13be detrimental to the applicant's ability to carry out his or 14her duties, possess such prerequisites of training, education 15and experience as the Board may from time to time prescribe, 16and shall be required to pass successfully mental, physical, 17psychiatric and other tests and examinations as may be 18prescribed by the Board. Preference shall be given in such 19appointments to persons who have honorably served in the 20military or naval services of the United States. All 21appointees shall serve a probationary period of 12 months and 22during that period may be discharged at the will of the 23Sheriff. However, civil service employees of the house of 24correction who have certified status at the time of the 25transfer of the house of correction to the County Department 26of Corrections are not subject to this probationary period,   SB1431- 7 -LRB104 10832 RTM 20913 b1and they shall retain their job titles, such tenure privileges 2as are now enjoyed and any subsequent title changes shall not 3cause reduction in rank or elimination of positions.4    An applicant who is a veteran, as that term is defined in 538 U.S.C. 101(2), who was discharged honorably or generally 6under honorable conditions no later than 6 months before 7applying may request examination to occur before the next 8scheduled examination date and, if requested, may be examined 9as soon as possible prior to the next examination date 10following receipt of the application. Once the applicant 11passes the examination and all other requirements to be on an 12eligibility list, the applicant shall be immediately placed on 13the eligibility list. Nothing in this paragraph waives 14eligibility for the applicant to receive military preference 15points during the application process or employment. 16(Source: P.A. 103-357, eff. 1-1-24; 103-623, eff. 1-1-25.)